Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.335

Validation of prior bond issues.

All terms, conditions, and covenants, including the pledges of student activity fees, student use fees and student building use fees, special student fees or any similar fees charged to all full time students, or to all students, as the case may be, registering at the state's colleges and universities, contained in all bonds heretofore issued to pay all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing or installing any lands, buildings, or facilities of the nature described in RCW 28B.10.300 are hereby declared to be lawful and binding in all respects.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 130 s 3.]